nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleie og -verktøy > Skotrær og -formere: Støvelformere; Støveltrær; Skoformere; Skotrær
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Dụng cụ chăm sóc giày > Nòng và khuôn giày: Định Hình Ống Chân Giày; Miếng lót giữ dáng giày; Khuôn giày; Nòng giày
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Товары для ухода за обувью > Колодки и формодержатели для обуви: Формодержатели для обуви; Деревянная колодка для сапог; Формодержатели для обуви; Колодки для обуви
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Cuidado del calzado > Hormas y ensanchadores de zapatos: Hormas para botas; Hormas para botas; Ensanchadores de zapatos; Hormas de zapatos
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Nega obutve in orodja > Leseni vložki in napenjalci za obutev: Napenjalci za škornje; Drevesa za škornje; Napenjalci za obutev; Leseni vložki za obutev
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 鞋类保养/工具 > 鞋楦/鞋撑: 靴撑; 靴楦; 鞋撑; 鞋楦
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Грижа за обувки и пособия > Дървета и оформящи средства за обувки: Средства за оформяне на ботуши; Дърво за обувки за запазване на формата; Средства за оформяне на обувки; Дървета за обувки
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Njega cipela i dodaci > Napinjači i kalupi za cipele: Kalupi za čizme; Kalupi za čizme; Kalupi za cipele; Napinjači za cipele
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 신발 관리 도구 > 슈트리/신발 셰이퍼: 부츠 쉐이퍼; 부츠 쉐이퍼; 신발 셰이퍼; 슈트리
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Ayakkabı Bakım ve Aletleri > Ayakkabı Kalıp ve Şekillendiricileri: Bot Kalıpları; Bot Kalıpları; Ayakkabı Şekillendiriciler; Ayakkabı Kalıpları
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Kenkien hoito ja välineet > Kenkäpuut ja muotoilijat: Saappaiden muotoilijat; Saapastuet; Kengänmuotoilijat; Kenkäpuut
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Entretien et accessoires pour chaussures > Embauchoirs: Embauchoirs; Arbres à bottes; Dispositif de mise en forme de la chaussure; Embauchoirs à chaussures
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Batų priežiūra ir įrankiai > Batų formos ir tempikliai: Aulinių batų formos; Kurpaliai; Batų formos; Batų tempikliai
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 靴のお手入れ > シューキーパー・ストレッチャー: ブーツシェイパー; ブーツキーパー; シューズシェイパー; シューツリー
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Skovård och skoverktyg > Skoblock: Stövelformare; Stövelblock; Skoformare; Skoträd
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Schuhpflege > Schuhspanner & -dehner: Stiefeldehner; Stiefelspanner; Schuhdehner; Schuhspanner
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Είδη & εργαλεία περιποίησης υποδημάτων > Καλούπια & διαμορφωτές υποδημάτων: Καλούπια μπότας; Καλούπια μπότας; Διαμορφωτές υποδημάτων; Καλούπια υποδημάτων
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 鞋子保養工具 > 鞋撐: 靴撐; 靴撐; 楦鞋器; 定型鞋撐
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleje og redskaber > Skolæste og skostivere: Støvleformere; Skoblokke; Skostivere; Skolæste
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Schoenverzorging > Schoenspanners: Laarzenspanners; Laarzenspanners; Schoenvormers; Overige schoenspanners
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Nástroje na starostlivosť o obuv > Rozťahováky a napínače obuvi: Napínače obuvi; Napínacie výplne do topánok; Napínače obuvi; Rozťahováky obuvi
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Pomůcky pro péči o obuv > Kopyta a tvarovače bot: Tvarovače bot; Natahovače bot; Tvarovače bot; Kopyta
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > เครื่องมือและการดูแลรองเท้า > ที่ดันทรงรองเท้า: อุปกรณ์จัดทรงรองเท้า; ดันทรงรองเท้า; เครื่องจัดทรงรองเท้า; ไม้สอดรองเท้า
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Środki i narzędzia do pielęgnacji obuwia > Prawidła do butów: Prawidła do kozaków; Prawidła do butów; Prawidła; Prawidła do obuwia
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Shoe Care & Tools > Shoe Trees & Shapers: Boot Shapers; Boot Trees; Shoe Shapers; Shoe Trees
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Manutenção e ferramentas para sapatos > Formas e modeladores para sapatos: Modeladores de botas; Formas para botas; Modeladores para calçados; Formas para calçados
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Utensílios e cuidado de calçado > Formas e moldes para calçado: Moldes para botas; Formas para botas; Moldes para calçado; Formas para calçado
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Produse și instrumente pentru îngrijirea încălțămintei > Șanuri și calapoade: Forme de susținere pentru cizme; Calapoade pentru cizme; Calapoade; Șanuri
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Cura delle scarpe > Allargascarpe: Tendistivali; Alberi per stivali; Dispositivi per allargare le scarpe; Forme per scarpe
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Cipőápolás és -eszközök > Cipőfák és -formázók: Csizmaformázók; Csizmatartó fák; Cipőformázók; Cipőfák